Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-10,140
Summer food service program; terms,
defined.

For
purposes of sections 79-10,140 to 79-10,142:

(1) Department means
the State Department of Education; and

(2) Sponsor means a public or private nonprofit
school food authority, local, municipal, or county government, public or private
nonprofit higher education institution participating in the National Youth
Sports Program, or residential public or private nonprofit summer camp that
provides food service similar to food service made available to children during
the school year under the school lunch program or the school breakfast program
under the Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. 1771 et seq.

Laws 2012, LB1090, § 1.
July 19, 2012